Nevada, session 83, AB146.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 126.036 is hereby amended to read as follows:
126.036 1. The liberty interest of a parent in the nurture,
education, care, custody , control and management of the parent’s
child is a fundamental right [.] recognized by the Nevada
Constitution and the United States Constitution.
2. Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
-
*AB146*

– 2 –
(a) Authorize a parent to engage in any unlawful conduct or to
abuse or neglect a child in violation of the laws of this State.
(b) Prohibit courts, law enforcement officers or employees of an
agency which provides child welfare services from acting in their
official capacity within the scope of their authority.
(c) Limit or abridge parental rights on account of disability.
3. Except as otherwise provided by specific statute, the
provisions of this section apply to any statute, local ordinance or
regulation and the implementation of such statute, local ordinance
or regulation regardless of whether such statute, local ordinance or
regulation was adopted or effective before, on or after October 1,
2013.
4. As used in this section [, “agency] :
(a) “Agency which provides child welfare services” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 432B.030.
(b) “Disability” means, with respect to a person:
(1) A physical or mental impairment that substantially
limits one or more of the major life activities of the person;
(2) A record of such an impairment; or
(3) Being regarded as having such an impairment.
H
-
*AB146*